Georgia, session 2025_26, HB793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Home Ownership Municipal Exemption
(H.O.M.E.) Act."
SECTION 2.
(a) As used in this Act, the term:
H. B. 793
- 1 -

LC 47 3619/AP
(1) "Ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes" means all ad valorem taxes for municipal
purposes levied by, for, or on behalf of the City of Brunswick, except for any ad valorem
taxes levied to pay interest on and to retire bonded indebtedness.
(2) "Homestead" means homestead as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of
the O.C.G.A., as amended.
(b) Each resident of the City of Brunswick is granted an exemption on such person's
homestead from City of Brunswick ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes in an amount
equal to a percentage off the assessed value of such person's homestead provided for below
based upon how long such resident has owned such homestead:
(1) Five years or less: 5 percent;
(2) Six to ten years: 10 percent;
(3) Eleven to 20 years: 20 percent;
(4) Twenty-one to 29 years: 30 percent; and
(5) Thirty years more: 50 percent.
The value of that property in excess of such exempted amount shall remain subject to
taxation.
(c) The surviving spouse of the person who has been granted the exemption provided for
in subsection (b) of this section shall continue to receive the exemption provided under
subsection (b) of this section, so long as such surviving spouse continues to occupy the
residence as a homestead.
(d) A person shall not receive the homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this
section unless such person or person's agent files an application with the governing
authority of the City of Brunswick, or the designee thereof, providing such information
relative to receiving such exemption as will enable the governing authority of the City of
Brunswick, or the designee thereof, to make a determination regarding the initial and
continuing eligibility of such person for such exemption or such person has already filed
for and is receiving a homestead exemption and such existing application provides
H. B. 793
- 2 -

LC 47 3619/AP
sufficient information to make such determination of eligibility. The governing authority
of the City of Brunswick or the designee thereof shall provide application forms for this
purpose.
(e) The exemption shall be claimed and returned as provided in Code Section 48-5-50.1
of the O.C.G.A., as amended. The exemption shall be automatically renewed from year
to year so long as the owner occupies the residence as a homestead. After such person has
filed the proper application as provided in subsection (d) of this section, it shall not be
necessary to make application thereafter for any year, and such exemption shall continue
to be allowed to such person. It shall be the duty of any such person granted the homestead
exemption under subsection (b) of this section to notify the governing authority of the City
of Brunswick, or the designee thereof, in the event that such person for any reason becomes
ineligible for such exemption.
(f) The exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to or affect state
or county ad valorem taxes or county or independent school district ad valorem taxes for
educational purposes. The homestead exemption granted by subsection (b) of this section
shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other homestead exemption applicable to City
of Brunswick ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes.
(g) The exemptions granted by this Act shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning
on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
H. B. 793
- 3 -

LC 47 3619/AP
SECTION 4.
The election superintendent of the City of Brunswick shall call and conduct an election as
provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of the City of
Brunswick for approval or rejection. The municipal election superintendent shall conduct
such election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue
the call and conduct such election as provided by general law. The municipal election
superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week
for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Glynn County.
The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides a homestead exemption from City
of Brunswick ad valorem taxes for municipal purposes in an amount equal to
( ) NO the following percentages off the assessed value of a homestead based upon
the number of years the owner has owned the homestead:
(1) Five years or less: 5 percent;
(2) Six to ten years: 10 percent;
(3) Eleven to 20 years: 20 percent;
(4) Twenty-one to 29 years: 30 percent; and
(5) Thirty years or more: 50 percent?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 2 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted as
provided in this section, Section 2 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Brunswick. It
shall be the municipal election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the
Secretary of State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal
H. B. 793
- 4 -

LC 47 3619/AP
election superintendent and are not intended as directory. If the municipal election
superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this section, any elector of the City of
Brunswick may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel the election superintendent to
perform his or her duties under this section. If the court finds that the municipal election
superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall fashion appropriate relief
requiring the municipal election superintendent to call and conduct such election on the date
required by this section or on the next date authorized for special elections provided for in
Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
100 SECTION 5.
101 Except as otherwise provided in Section 4 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
102 its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
103 SECTION 6.
104 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 793
- 5 -